District of Columbia statutes.
3-1315

Sale of lottery and daily numbers games tickets by licensed agents; unauthorized sale.

The Board may license, as agents to sell lottery and daily numbers games tickets, such persons and establishments as, in its judgment, possess the requisite qualifications, including, but not limited to: The financial responsibility of the person and his business or activity; the accessibility of the place of business or activity to the public; the sufficiency of existing licenses to serve the public convenience; and the volume of expected sales. No license as an agent shall be issued to any person to engage in business primarily as a lottery agent. The Board may authorize compensation to such agents in such manner and amounts and subject to such limitations as it may determine are necessary to assure adequate availability of lottery and daily numbers games tickets. The Board shall also require that an agent be bonded in such amounts and in such manner as determined by the Board. The Board shall condition the issuance of a license upon the written agreement of the licensee to indemnify and to save harmless the District of Columbia against any and all actions, claims, and demands of whatever kind or nature which the District of Columbia may incur by reason of or in consequence of issuing such license. No lottery or daily numbers games tickets shall be sold at other than the price fixed by the Board, and no sale shall be made by other than a licensee or his employee. Any person convicted of violating this section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $1,000 or imprisonment not to exceed 6 months, or both.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2515.

Prior Codifications